Wyoming, session 2025, HB0015.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi)(B), 35-11-417(e) and
35-11-423(b) are amended to read:

35-11-401. Compliance generally; exceptions.

(e) The provisions of this article shall not apply to
any of the following activities:

HB0015

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0200
(vi) Limited mining operations, whether
commercial or noncommercial, for the removal of sand,
gravel, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast or
feldspar from an area of fifteen (15) acres or less of
affected land, excluding roads used to access the mining
operation, if the operator has written permission for the
operation from the owner and lessee, if any, of the
surface. The operator shall notify the land quality
division of the department of environmental quality and the
inspector of mines within the department of workforce
services of the location of the land to be mined and the
postal address of the operator at least thirty (30) days
before commencing operations. A copy of the notice shall
also be mailed to all surface owners located within one (1)
mile of the proposed boundary of the limited mining
operation at least thirty (30) days before commencing
operations. The operator shall notify the land quality
division of the department of environmental quality of the
date of commencement of limited mining operations within
thirty (30) days of commencing operations. Limited mining
operations authorized under this paragraph are subject to
the following:

HB0015

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0200
(B) Before commencing any limited mining
operations, the operator shall file a bond to insure
reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this act and
the following:

(I) Except as otherwise provided in
this subparagraph, for limited mining operations that
commence before July 1, 2025, the operator shall file a
bond in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) per
acre, except of affected land, including roads used to
access the mining operation;

(II) Except as otherwise provided in
this subparagraph, for limited mining operations that
commence on and after July 1, 2025, the operator shall file
a bond in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00)
per acre of affected land, including roads used to access
the mining operation;

(III) For quarries for which
commencing operations before July 1, 2025, the bond amount
shall not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per
HB0015

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0200
acre of affected land, including roads used to access the
mining operation;.

(IV) For quarries commencing
operations on and after July 1, 2025, the bond amount shall
not exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000.00) per acre of
affected land, including roads used to access the mining
operation;

(V) The operator may file a full-cost
bond to insure reclamation in accordance with W.S.
35-11-417;

(VI) Within ninety (90) one hundred
fifty (150) days after limited mining operations commence,
the administrator may require the operator to post an
additional bond per acre of affected land if he determines
that such the amount is necessary to insure reclamation.
The operator shall post the additional bond not later than
thirty (30) forty-five (45) days after receipt of such the
notification.;

35-11-417. Bonding provisions.
HB0015

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0200

(e) When the reclamation plan for any affected land
has been completed, the administrator may recommend to the
director the release of up to seventy-five percent (75%) of
the bond required for that affected land. The remaining
portion of the bond shall be not less than ten thousand
dollars ($10,000.00), and shall be held for a period of at
least five (5) years after the date of reduction to assure
proper revegetation and restoration of groundwater. The
retained portion of the bond may be returned to the
operator at an earlier date if a release signed by the
surface owner and approved by the administrator and
director is obtained. For limited mining operations
authorized under W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi), the administrator
may, after consultation with all affected surface owners,
recommend to the director the release of the bond after two
(2) successful growing seasons that establish permanent
vegetative cover.

35-11-423. Release of bonds.

(b) The retained portion of the bond may be returned
to the operator at an earlier date if a release signed by
HB0015

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0200
the surface owner and approved by the administrator is
obtained. For limited mining operations authorized under
W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi), the bond may, after consultation
with all affected surface owners, be released after two (2)
successful growing seasons that establish permanent
vegetative cover.

Section 2. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation by the department of environmental quality,
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0015